Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-148.07
Bank subsidiary corporation; authorized activities.

A bank subsidiary corporation shall engage in only those activities prescribed under subdivision (6) of section 8-101.03 or that its bank shareholder or shareholders are authorized to perform under the laws of this state and shall engage in those activities only at locations in this state where the bank shareholder or shareholders could be authorized to perform activities.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 49.